Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Gas System Restoration Project

147A.200.
Gas system restoration and development project account — Review board — Loan applications.

The Department for Local Government is authorized and directed to apply for and receive federal funds to be placed in a state account called the gas system restoration and development project account, and to provide staff to administer said funds. The funds in this account may be used in any gas system restoration or development project approved by the Gas System Restoration and Development Project Account Review Board.

A Gas System Restoration and Development Project Account Review Board is established and shall consist of eight (8) members appointed by the Governor. The board shall be chaired by the commissioner of the Department for Local Government and shall include representatives of the Public Service Commission, state fire marshal, Department for Local Government, Kentucky Infrastructure Authority, banking and finance industry, commercial or industrial consumers, Kentucky Gas Association, and low-income or minority group consumers. Members shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses in attending meetings.

The review board shall meet as necessary and shall establish rules for conducting its business. The review board shall consider applications for loans from the account and approve or disapprove loan applications. No loan shall be considered unless the applicant has complied with all construction and securities requirements of the Public Service Commission. In reviewing loan applications, the review board may request the testimony of the county judge/executive of an affected county and any other witnesses deemed appropriate.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 295, § 20, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 69, § 59, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 551, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 137, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 117, § 13, effective July 15, 2010.

147A.250.
Railtrail Development Office — Authority to apply for grants.

A Railtrail Development Office is hereby created within the Department for Local Government. The Department for Local Government shall ensure that the office has the necessary expertise to carry out the requirements imposed upon it by this section. Among other railtrail functions and duties which may be assigned to it, the Railtrail Development Office shall carry on at least the following responsibilities:

The office shall monitor the proceedings of the United States Department of Transportation’s Surface Transportation Board and shall disseminate to interested entities in Kentucky information regarding those proceedings of interest to railtrail conversion or policy in the Commonwealth. If a railroad applies to the Surface Transportation Board for authority to discontinue service over or abandon a railroad corridor in the Commonwealth, the office shall immediately notify those political subdivisions through which the corridor passes and any interested state agency of the proceedings and the potential for trail development of the corridor. Notice shall also be sent to the county judge/executive of each county through which the proposed abandonment passes, who shall distribute copies of the notice to each member of the chief legislative body of the county government at the next regularly scheduled meeting of that legislative body. The office shall also send a copy of the notice to each soil and water conservation district through which the abandonment passes. If time is of the essence and it appears that the corridor is a suitable candidate for conversion to a railtrail and that no other railtrail interested entity will be participating in the federal proceeding, the office shall take those steps necessary to cause a railbanking or public use condition to be imposed in the federal proceeding;

The office shall assist any requesting political subdivision or agency of state government with assistance on any application to the Surface Transportation Board regarding an abandoned or about-to-be-abandoned railroad corridor, including any requests for railbanking or imposition of public use conditions;

The office shall coordinate and promote railtrail development efforts among the various agencies of state government, including the Department of Parks and the Transportation Cabinet. While this subsection does not confer upon the office any powers beyond those that it may ordinarily possess, every entity of state government shall cooperate with the office to the extent practicable under the circumstances;

The office shall furnish to requesting political subdivisions assistance in applying to available federal, state, or local funding sources for funds to be used for the process of converting railroad corridors into public use trails; and

The office may apply for federal, state, or private grants or other forms of financial assistance to carry on its mission.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 338, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 47, § 74, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 14, effective July 15, 2010.